Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 14-2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 14-2. The Director of the Bureau of Standards shall
have charge of the various standards of weights, measures, and
testing devices received by this state from the United States
pursuant to Resolutions of Congress approved June 14, 1836, and July
27, 1866, and any future standards which may be received from the
United States. The Director shall have charge of the various state
or office standards purchased by this state for the Bureau.
The Director shall have charge and control of the standard
methods of weighing, measuring, and testing in this state. The
Director shall maintain the standards in good order and shall submit
a set of standards called the reference standards to the National
Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) a qualified laboratory
for certification.

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 14-3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 14-3. The weights, measures, and testing devices
received from the United States pursuant to Joint Resolutions of
Congress approved June 14, 1836, and July 27, 1866, now in the care
and custody of the State Bureau of Standards, and the weights and
measures in conformity with the Resolutions, when certified by the
National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) a qualified
laboratory, shall be the state standards of weights and measures.
Copies of the state standards of weights and measures and other
weights, measures, and apparatus shall be supplied by this state to
implement the provisions of this article.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1542 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 4th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1542 Page 3